Maine, session 132, LD1484.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §7070, sub-§2, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 615, §2, is further
amended to read:
E. Except as provided in paragraph F and section 7070‑A, complaints, charges or
accusations of misconduct, replies to those complaints, charges or accusations and any
other information or materials that may result in disciplinary action. If disciplinary
action is taken, and that disciplinary action is of a nature that imposes or results in a
financial disadvantage, including, but not limited to, termination, demotion or
suspension without pay, the final written decision relating to that action is no longer
confidential after the decision is completed if it imposes or upholds discipline. The
decision must state the conduct or other facts on the basis of which disciplinary action
is being imposed and the conclusions of the acting authority as to the reasons for that
action. If an arbitrator completely overturns or removes disciplinary action from an
employee personnel file, the final written decision is public except that the employee's
name must be deleted from the final written decision and kept confidential. If the
employee whose name was deleted from the final written decision discloses that the
employee is the person who is the subject of the final written decision, the entire final
written report, with regard to that employee, is public.
For purposes of this paragraph, "final written decision" means:
(1) The final written administrative decision that is not appealed pursuant to a
grievance arbitration procedure; or
(2) If the final written administrative decision is appealed to arbitration, the final
written decision of a neutral arbitrator.
A final written administrative decision that is appealed to arbitration is no longer
confidential 120 days after a written request for the decision is made to the employer
if the final written decision of the neutral arbitrator is not issued and released before
the expiration of the 120 days; and
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §503, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 159, §2, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) Complaints, charges or accusations of misconduct, replies to those complaints,
charges or accusations and any other information or materials that may result in
disciplinary action. If disciplinary action is taken, and that disciplinary action is
of a nature that imposes or results in a financial disadvantage, including, but not
limited to, termination, demotion or suspension without pay, the final written
decision relating to that action is no longer confidential after the decision is
completed if it imposes or upholds discipline. The decision must state the conduct
or other facts on the basis of which disciplinary action is being imposed and the
conclusions of the acting authority as to the reasons for that action. If an arbitrator
completely overturns or removes disciplinary action from an employee personnel
file, the final written decision is public except that the employee's name must be
deleted from the final written decision and kept confidential. If the employee
whose name was deleted from the final written decision discloses that the
employee is the person who is the subject of the final written decision, the entire
final written report, with regard to that employee, is public.
Page 1 - 132LR1274(01)

For purposes of this subparagraph, "final written decision" means:
(a) The final written administrative decision that is not appealed pursuant to a
grievance arbitration procedure; or
(b) If the final written administrative decision is appealed to arbitration, the
final written decision of a neutral arbitrator.
A final written administrative decision that is appealed to arbitration is no longer
confidential 120 days after a written request for the decision is made to the
employer if the final written decision of the neutral arbitrator is not issued and
released before the expiration of the 120 days; and
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §2702, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 451, §3, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) Complaints, charges or accusations of misconduct, replies to those complaints,
charges or accusations and any other information or materials that may result in
disciplinary action. If disciplinary action is taken, and that disciplinary action is
of a nature that imposes or results in a financial disadvantage, including, but not
limited to, termination, demotion or suspension without pay, the final written
decision relating to that action is no longer confidential after the decision is
completed if it imposes or upholds discipline. The decision must state the conduct
or other facts on the basis of which disciplinary action is being imposed and the
conclusions of the acting authority as to the reasons for that action. If an arbitrator
completely overturns or removes disciplinary action from an employee personnel
file, the final written decision is public except that the employee's name must be
deleted from the final written decision and kept confidential. If the employee
whose name was deleted from the final written decision discloses that the
employee is the person who is the subject of the final written decision, the entire
final written report, with regard to that employee, is public.
For purposes of this subparagraph, "final written decision" means:
(a) The final written administrative decision that is not appealed pursuant to a
grievance arbitration procedure; or
(b) If the final written administrative decision is appealed to arbitration, the
final written decision of a neutral arbitrator.
A final written administrative decision that is appealed to arbitration is no longer
confidential 120 days after a written request for the decision is made to the
employer if the final written decision of the neutral arbitrator is not issued and
released before the expiration of the 120 days; and